Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 12. Sale of Assets

§ 17-19-1201.
Sale of assets in regular course of activities and mortgage of assets.

A corporation may on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the board of directors:

Sell, lease, exchange or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property in the usual and regular course of its activities; or

Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness, whether with or without recourse, or otherwise encumber any or all of its property whether or not in the usual and regular course of its activities.

Unless the articles require it, approval of the members or any other person of a transaction described in subsection (a) of this section is not required.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1202.
Sale of assets other than in regular course of activities.

A corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property, with or without the goodwill, other than in the usual and regular course of its activities on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the corporation’s board if the proposed transaction is authorized by subsection (b) of this section.

Unless this act, the articles, bylaws or the board of directors or members, acting pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, require a greater vote or voting by class, the proposed transaction to be authorized shall be approved:

By the board;

By the members by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast or a majority of the voting power, whichever is less; and

In writing by any person or persons whose approval is required by a provision of the articles authorized by W.S.

17-19-1030

for an amendment to the articles or bylaws.

If the corporation does not have members the transaction shall be approved by a vote of a majority of the directors in office at the time the transaction is approved. In addition the corporation shall provide notice of any directors’ meeting at which the approval is to be obtained in accordance with W.S. 17-19-822(c). The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property or assets of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a description of the transaction.

The board may condition its submission of the proposed transaction, and the members may condition their approval of the transaction, on receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or on any other basis.

If the corporation seeks to have the transaction approved by the members at a membership meeting, the corporation shall give notice to its members of the proposed membership meeting in accordance with W.S.

17-19-705

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property or assets of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a description of the transaction.

If the board needs to have the transaction approved by the members by written consent or written ballot, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a description of the transaction.

A public benefit or religious corporation shall give written notice to the secretary of state (who shall then give notice to the attorney general) twenty (20) days before it sells, leases, exchanges or otherwise disposes of all, or substantially all, of its property if the transaction is not in the usual and regular course of its activities unless the attorney general has given the corporation a written waiver of this subsection.

After a sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of property is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, without further action by the members or any other person who approved the transaction in accordance with the procedure set forth in the resolution proposing the transaction or, if none is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

Conveyance of corporate property. —

Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act does not allow a corporation to convey substantially all of its property without a vote of approval by the members. Jewish Community Ass'n v. Community First Nat'l Bank, 6 P.3d 1264,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2000).